Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Chapter 51. General Provisions
§ 5123.
Transportation of a child.

The Commissioner for Children and Families shall ensure that all reasonable and appropriate measures consistent with public safety are made to transport or escort a child subject to this chapter in a manner that:

reasonably avoids physical and psychological trauma;

respects the privacy of the child; and

represents the least restrictive means necessary for the safety of the child.

The Commissioner for Children and Families shall have the authority to select the person or persons who may transport a child under the Commissioner’s care and custody.

The Commissioner shall ensure supervisory review of every decision to transport a child using mechanical restraints. When transportation with restraints for a particular child is approved, the reasons for the approval shall be documented in writing.

It is the policy of the State of Vermont that mechanical restraints are not routinely used on children subject to this chapter unless circumstances dictate that such methods are necessary.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 28

, § 2, eff. May 21, 2009.

§ 5124.
Postadoption contact agreements.

Either or both parents and each intended adoptive parent may enter into a postadoption contact agreement regarding communication or contact between either or both parents and the child after the finalization of an adoption by the intended adoptive parent or parents who are parties to the agreement. Such an agreement may be entered into if:

the child is in the custody of:

the Department for Children and Families; or

a nonparent pursuant to subdivision 5318(a)(2) or (a)(7) or subdivision 5232(b)(2) or (b)(3) of this title;

an order terminating parental rights has not yet been entered; and

either or both parents agree to a voluntary termination of parental rights, including an agreement in a case that began as an involuntary termination of parental rights.

The court shall approve the postadoption contact agreement if:

it determines that the child’s best interests will be served by postadoption communication or contact with either or both parents; and
(1) (A) it determines that the child’s best interests will be served by postadoption communication or contact with either or both parents; and

in making a best interests determination, it may consider:

the age of the child;

the length of time that the child has been under the actual care, custody, and control of a person other than a parent;

the desires of the child, the child’s parents, and the child’s intended adoptive parents;

the child’s relationship with and the interrelationships between the child’s parents, the child’s intended adoptive parents, the child’s siblings, and any other person with a significant relationship with the child;

the willingness of the parents to respect the bond between the child and the child’s intended adoptive parents;

the willingness of the intended adoptive parents to respect the bond between the child and the parents;

the adjustment to the child’s home, school, and community;

any evidence of abuse or neglect of the child;

the recommendation of any guardian ad litem;

the recommendation of a therapist or mental health care provider working directly with the child; and

the recommendation of the Department;

it has reviewed and made each of the following a part of the court record:

a sworn affidavit by the parties to the agreement that affirmatively states that the agreement was entered into knowingly and voluntarily and is not the product of coercion, fraud, or duress and that the parties have not relied on any representations other than those contained in the agreement;

a written acknowledgment by each parent that the termination of parental rights is irrevocable, even if the intended adoption is not finalized, the adoptive parents do not abide by the postadoption contact agreement, or the adoption is later dissolved;

an agreement to the postadoption contact or communication from the child to be adopted, if he or she is 14 years of age or older; and

an agreement to the postadoption contact or communication in writing from the Department, the guardian ad litem, and the attorney for the child.

A postadoption contact agreement must be in writing and signed by each parent and each intended adoptive parent entering into the agreement. There may be separate agreements for each parent. The agreement shall specify:

the form of communication or contact to take place;

the frequency of the communication or contact;

if visits are agreed to, whether supervision shall be required, and if supervision is required, what type of supervision shall be required;

if written communication or exchange of information is agreed upon, whether that will occur directly or through the Vermont Adoption Registry, set forth in 15A V.S.A. § 6-103;

if the Adoption Registry shall act as an intermediary for written communication, that the signing parties will keep their addresses updated with the Adoption Registry;

that failure to provide contact due to the child’s illness or other good cause shall not constitute grounds for an enforcement proceeding;

that the right of the signing parties to change their residence is not impaired by the agreement;

an acknowledgment by the intended adoptive parents that the agreement grants either or both parents the right to seek to enforce the postadoption contact agreement;

an acknowledgment that the adoptive parent’s judgment regarding the child is in the child’s best interests;

the finality of the termination of parental rights and of the adoption shall not be affected by implementation of the provisions of the postadoption contact agreement; and

a disagreement between the parties or litigation brought to enforce or modify the agreement shall not affect the validity of the termination of parental rights or the adoption.

A copy of the order approving the postadoption contact agreement and the postadoption contact agreement shall be filed with the Probate Division of the Superior Court with the petition to adopt filed under 15A V.S.A. Article 3 and, if the agreement specifies a role for the Adoption Registry, with the Registry.

The order approving a postadoption contact agreement shall be a separate order issued before and contingent upon the final order of voluntary termination of parental rights.

The executed postadoption contact agreement shall become final upon legal finalization of an adoption under 15A V.S.A. Article 3.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 60

, § 10; amended

2015, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 5125.
Reinstatement of parental rights.

Petition for reinstatement.

A petition for reinstatement of parental rights may be filed by the Department for Children and Families on behalf of a child in the custody of the Department under the following conditions:

the child’s adoption has been dissolved; or

the child has not been adopted after at least three years from the date of the court order terminating parental rights.

The child, if 14 years of age or older, may also file a petition to reinstate parental rights if the adoption has been dissolved, or if parental rights have been terminated and the child has not been adopted after three years from the date of the court order terminating parental rights. This section shall not apply to children who have been placed under permanent guardianship pursuant to

14 V.S.A. § 2664

.

Permanency plan. The Department shall file an updated permanency plan with the petition for reinstatement. The updated plan shall address the material change in circumstances since the termination of parental rights, the Department’s efforts to achieve permanency, the reasons for the parent’s desire to have rights reinstated, any statements by the child expressing the child’s opinions about reinstatement, and the parent’s present ability and willingness to resume or assume parental duties.

Hearing.

The court shall hold a hearing to consider whether reinstatement is in the child’s best interests. The court shall conditionally grant the petition if it finds by clear and convincing evidence that:

the parent is presently willing and has the ability to provide for the child’s present and future safety, care, protection, education, and healthy mental, physical, and social development;

reinstatement is the child’s express preference;

if the child is 14 years of age or older and has filed the petition, the child is of sufficient maturity to understand the nature of this decision;

the child has not been adopted, or the adoption has been dissolved;

the child is not likely to be adopted; and

reinstatement of parental rights is in the best interests of the child.

Upon a finding by clear and convincing evidence that all conditions set forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection exist and that reinstatement of parental rights is in the child’s best interests, the court shall issue a conditional custody order for up to six months transferring temporary legal custody of the child to the parent, subject to conditions as the court may deem necessary and sufficient to ensure the child’s safety and well-being. The court may order the Department to provide transition services to the family as appropriate. If during this time period the child is removed from the parent’s temporary conditional custody due to allegations of abuse or neglect, the court shall dismiss the petition for reinstatement of parental rights if the court finds the allegations have been proven by a preponderance of the evidence.

Final order. After the child is placed with the parent for up to six months pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, the court shall hold a hearing to determine if the placement has been successful. The court shall enter a final order of reinstatement of parental rights upon a finding by a preponderance of the evidence that placement continues to be in the child’s best interests.

Effect of reinstatement. Reinstatement of parental rights does not vacate or otherwise affect the validity of the original order terminating parental rights. Reinstatement restores a parent’s legal rights to his or her child, including all rights, powers, privileges, immunities, duties, and obligations that were terminated by the court in the termination of parental rights order. Such reinstatement shall be a recognition that the parent’s and child’s situations have changed since the time of the termination of parental rights, and reunification is appropriate. An order reinstating the legal parent and child relationship as to one parent of the child has no effect on the legal rights of any other parent whose rights to the child have been terminated by the court; or the legal sibling relationship between the child and any other children of the parent. A parent whose rights are reinstated pursuant to this section is not liable for child support owed to the Department during the period from termination of parental rights to reinstatement.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. Sept. 1, 2016.